California, session 20252026, AB2338.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 739.18 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:739.18. (a) (1) The commission shall require every electrical corporation or gas corporation, as part of every general rate case application, to do both of the following:(A) Submit an inflation-constrained rate case scenario in which cumulative increases in annual expenditures proposed to be authorized in that proceeding do not exceed the projected federal social security beneficiary cost-of-living adjustment. This scenario shall include the highest priority spending needs of the electrical corporation or gas corporation.(B) Compare the inflation-constrained rate case scenario submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) with the primary rate case plan submitted by the electrical corporation or gas corporation.(2) The commission may authorize expenditures in excess of the inflation-constrained rate case scenario if it determines that the electrical corporation or gas corporation has provided clear and convincing evidence that a higher level of expenditures is necessary to ensure the safe and reliable operation of its electrical system or gas system.(b) The commission shall apply heightened scrutiny to any request that is not described in subdivision (a), is submitted by an electrical corporation or gas corporation, and is likely to increase total systemwide expenditures beyond the projected federal social security beneficiary cost-of-living adjustment.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SECTION 1.Section 9508.5 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:9508.5.Upon request, a local publicly owned electric utility serving end-use customers shall provide the Energy Commission with information the Energy Commission determines is necessary to evaluate the progress made by the local publicly owned electric utility in meeting the requirements of Section 9620.